Tennessee, session 114, HB1204.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 55-10-406(e)(3)(A)(iv), is amended
by adding the following at the end of the subdivision:
A law enforcement officer may assist a qualified practitioner in using reasonable force to
obtain the sample of blood from the operator.
SECTION 2. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 55-10-407(a)(1), is amended by
deleting "One (1) year" and substituting "One (1) year and six (6) months".
SECTION 3. Section 1 of this act takes effect upon becoming a law, the public welfare
requiring it. Section 2 of this act takes effect July 1, 2025, the public welfare requiring it.
HB1204
002840
- 1 -